Indiana, session 2026, SB111.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 31-31-8-7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) Subject to subsection (d), a juvenile detention
facility shall do the following with respect to residents of the
detention facility:
(1) Offer a resident in-person contact visitation with:
(A) the resident's parent, guardian, or custodian;
(B) another person who:
(i) has a supportive relationship with the resident; and
(ii) has been approved for visitation with the resident by
a court; and
(C) the resident's own child.
(2) Allow a resident an in-person contact visit:
(A) at least two (2) times per week; and
(B) at least one (1) hour per visit;
unless the detention facility determines that extraordinary
conditions exist and that in-person contact visitation would
2026 IN 111—LS 6395/DI 148


place the safety or security of the resident or detention facility
staff at risk.
(3) If the detention facility determines that the person
identified in subdivision (1) cannot attend in-person contact
visitation the resident prefers, for any reason, or in-person
contact visitation cannot be safely accommodated under
subdivision (2):
(A) document the reason and circumstances that prompted
the detention facility's determination;
(B) if necessary, notify family or visitors of the resident
that in-person contact visitation cannot be accommodated;
and
(C) make reasonable efforts to arrange an alternative
audiovisual visitation between the resident and any person
identified in subdivision (1) at a reasonable time.
(4) Allow a resident to conduct a minimum of two (2)
telephone calls each week with:
(A) the resident's parent, guardian, or custodian;
(B) another person who:
(i) has a supportive relationship with the resident; and
(ii) has been approved for visitation with the resident by
a court; and
(C) the resident's own child.
A detention facility may not limit the length of a telephone call
under this subdivision to less than ten (10) minutes.
(5) Provide notice to a resident, and the resident's family, of
the schedule for:
(A) in-person contact visitation with the resident; and
(B) the resident's weekly telephone calls or audiovisual
visits.
(6) Make reasonable efforts to allow visitation of residents on
multiple days of the week, including both weekends and
weekdays, and at times that are not limited to regular
business hours.
(7) Subject to subsection (b), supervise visits with residents.
(b) A juvenile detention facility shall not do the following:
(1) Monitor conversations that take place during a resident's
in-person contact visit, except when reasonable suspicion
exists that a crime, escape, or threat to safety or security is
likely to occur.
(2) Revoke or cancel a resident's in-person contact visitation
under this section on the basis of the resident's behavior,
2026 IN 111—LS 6395/DI 148


unless the resident's behavior interferes with the safe conduct
of a visit.
(3) Charge the resident, visitors, or phone call recipients
directly or indirectly for any costs associated with providing
the visitation and telephone calls described in this section.
(c) If a juvenile detention facility determines that a safety risk
prevents an in-person contact visit from occurring, the detention
facility shall:
(1) document the reasons and circumstances that prompted
the detention facility's determination;
(2) notify the visitor of the revocation or cancellation of the
in-person contact visit;
(3) make reasonable efforts to reschedule the in-person
contact visit when the detention facility determines that the
visit no longer presents a safety risk; and
(4) make reasonable efforts to arrange an alternative
audiovisual visitation between the resident and persons
identified in subsection (a)(1) at a reasonable time.
(d) This section does not obligate a juvenile detention facility to
provide:
(1) transportation to; or
(2) electronic devices for;
a person identified in subsection (a)(1) who desires to visit a
resident.
(e) This section provides a minimum standard for juvenile
resident visitation at a juvenile detention facility and does not limit
a detention facility's ability to provide additional visitation
opportunities and behavioral incentives.
SECTION 2. IC 31-31-9-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.56-2023,
SECTION 304, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The juvenile detention center
shall be operated in accordance with:
(1) rules adopted by the department of correction; and
(2) IC 31-31-8-7.
(b) The department of child services shall make an annual
inspection of the center and report to the advisory board whether the
center meets the requirements established by the Indiana department
of health for temporary detention centers. Any noncompliance with
those requirements must be stated in writing to the advisory board.
2026 IN 111—LS 6395/DI 148